Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 98.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 98.6. Because of the extraordinarily rich
paleontological heritage of the State of Oklahoma, the Legislature
hereby declares Saurophaganax Maximus Sauroposeidon proteles to be
the State Fossil of Oklahoma. This spectacular dinosaur, the
“greatest king of reptile eaters”, once roamed this great land. It
is only known from Oklahoma and has surpassed the Tyrannosaurus rex,
the “king of the dinosaurs”, as the greatest predator of earth’s
history This Early Cretaceous sauropod dinosaur is among the tallest
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2970 Page 1

ever discovered. When found in Atoka County in Southeast Oklahoma
in 1994, the fossils were so large they were initially mistaken for
petrified tree trunks. These fossils have been essential to
understanding the species and highlight Oklahoma’s important role in
the study of prehistoric life.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate










ENGR. H. B. NO. 2970 Page 2